New Jersey, session 222, S2628.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2021, c.462 (C.39:10-19.5) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  A licensee may conduct online sales of motor vehicles anywhere in this State in accordance with this chapter subject to the additional requirements set forth in subsection b. of this section. b.    In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in this chapter for engaging in the business of buying, selling, and dealing in motor vehicles in this State, licensees conducting online sales of motor vehicles in this State shall meet the following requirements: (1)   Licensees shall maintain a physical presence in the State of New Jersey equal to or greater than the minimum established place of business requirements for new and used motor vehicle dealerships pursuant to R.S.39:10-19; (2)   Licensees may keep and maintain non-physical, electronic records of online sales of motor vehicles and shall have a stable Internet connection in the office, but the records shall be kept and maintained in a format that allows [immediate] for inspection and examination by the chief administrator or his or her agent; and (3)   Licensees shall only conduct online sales of motor vehicles that constitute inventory held for sale by the licensee or a licensed parent or licensed affiliate thereof. (cf: P.L.2021, c.462, s.3) 2.    (New section) Notwithstanding any other law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, or a designee, shall give one business day advanced written notice to an individual or entity engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in motor vehicles; a licensed motor vehicle dealer; or a licensed leasing dealer prior to entering the building of the individual or entity engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in motor vehicles; the licensed motor vehicle dealer; or the licensed leasing dealer for the purpose of examining books and records. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.